District of Columbia statutes.
50-1807

Evidentiary value of violation or compliance.

Neither a violation of this chapter nor compliance with its terms shall constitute evidence of negligence, evidence of contributory negligence, or a basis for a civil action for damages. Also, a violation or compliance with this chapter shall not be used as a basis for mitigating damages arising from a civil liability.

Dec. 12, 1985, D.C. Law 6-73, § 8, 32 DCR 6344

Expiration of Law 6-73

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-1801.

1981 Ed., § 40-1607.